Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.555

Release of information not restricted by pending appeal, petition, or writ.

An offender's pending appeal, petition for personal restraint, or writ of habeas corpus shall not restrict the agency's, official's, or employee's authority to release relevant information concerning an offender's prior criminal history. However, the agency must release the latest dispositions of the charges as provided in chapter 10.97 RCW, the Washington state criminal records privacy act.

[ 1990 c 3 s 118.]